District of Columbia statutes.
47-2845

Prosecutions.

Prosecutions for violations of any of the provisions of this chapter, or of any section added hereto from time to time by the Council of the District of Columbia, or of any regulation made by the Council under authority of this chapter, shall be on information in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia or any of his assistants.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 628, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 47
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 563, ch. 366
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 43(f), 35 DCR 147
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(l)(4), 52 DCR 2638
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 48(h)(3), 53 DCR 6794
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.
1981 Ed., § 47-2845.
1973 Ed., § 47-2346.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
D.C. Law 16-191 validated a previously made technical correction.